Utah statutes.
31A-11-102.   Activities of motor clubs.
(1)  Motor clubs authorized under this chapter may provide or arrange for the
following services:
(a)  service as producer in obtaining insurance coverage from authorized
insurers, subject to Chapter 23a, Insurance Marketing - Licensing Producers,
Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries;
(b)  provision of, or payment for, legal services and costs in the defense of
traffic offenses or other legal problems connected with the ownership or use
of a motor vehicle, provided the maximum amount payable for any one incident
is not more than 100 times the annual charge for the motor club contract;
(c)  guaranteed arrest bond certificates and cash bond guarantees as specified
under Section 31A-11-112;
(d)  payment of specified expenses resulting from an automobile accident,
other than expenses for personal injury or for damage to an automobile,
provided the maximum amount payable for any one accident is not more than 100
times the annual charge for the motor club contract;
(e)  towing and emergency road services and theft services; and
(f)  any services relating to travel not involving the transfer and
distribution of risk.
(2)  Unless they are also insurers under Chapter 5 or 14, motor clubs may not
provide any liability or physical damage insurance or insurance of life or
accident and health, whether or not related to motor vehicles.
(3)  If a motor club is a separate division of a corporation, the activities
of the other divisions of the corporation are not limited by this section, if
the motor club division complies with Subsection 31A-11-106(3).
